South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3952.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: Darlington County millage levy SECTION 1. Section 2 of Act 571 of 1965 is amended to read: SECTION 2. The Florence-Darlington Technical Education Commission shall file with the Darlington County Council an itemized budget of the operating expenses of the Florence-Darlington Technical Education Center for the fiscal year ending June 30, 1965, and each year thereafter, prior to submitting a claim for the funds provided in this act. The county council shall examine the itemized budget, make any necessary adjustments, and its approval shall constitute the authority and direction to the county auditor to levy the tax provided for in Section 1 upon all taxable property in Darlington County sufficient to provide the funds required by the approved budget. Time effective SECTION 2.    This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor and first applies to Fiscal Year 2025-2026. Ratified the 11th day of March, 2025. Approved the 13th day of March, 2025. __________